Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.701

Personal property—Receiver's duties.

(1) The receiver shall inventory, package, and seal uncalled for and unclaimed personal property left with the credit union, including, but not limited to, property held in safe deposit boxes, and arrange for the packages to be held in safekeeping. The credit union, its directors and officers, and the receiver, shall be relieved of responsibility and liability for the property held in safekeeping. The receiver shall promptly send to each person in whose name the property stood on the books of the credit union, at the person's last known address, a registered letter notifying the person that the property will be held in the person's name for a period of not less than two years.

(2) After the expiration of two years from the date of mailing the notice, the receiver shall promptly send to each person in whose name the property stood on the books of the credit union, at the person's last known address, a registered letter providing notice of sale. The letter must indicate that the receiver will sell the property set out in the notice, at a public auction at a specified time and place, not less than thirty days after the date of mailing the letter. The receiver may sell the property unless the person, prior to the sale, presents satisfactory evidence of the person's right to the property. A notice of the time and place of the sale must be published once within ten days prior to the sale in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the sale is to be held.

(3) Any property, for which the address of the owner or owners is not known, may be sold at public auction after it has been held by the receiver for two years. A notice of the time and place of the sale must be published once within ten days prior to the sale in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the sale is to be held.

(4) Whenever the personal property left with the credit union consists either wholly or in part, of documents, letters, or other papers of a private nature, the documents, letters, or papers may not be sold, but must be retained by the receiver and may be destroyed after a period of five years.

[ 1997 c 397 s 79.]